Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.020

Who may maintain action.

When a public officer by official misconduct or neglect of duty, shall forfeit his or her official bond or render his or her sureties therein liable upon such bond, any person injured by such misconduct or neglect, or who is by law entitled to the benefit of the security, may maintain an action at law thereon in his or her own name against the officer and his or her sureties to recover the amount to which he or she may by reason thereof be entitled.

[ 2012 c 117 s 95; Code 1881 s 653; 1877 p 135 s 656; 1869 p 152 s 593; RRS s 959.]

NOTES:

Action on official bond: RCW 42.08.080.